District of Columbia statutes.
31-4332

Appeals from Commissioner to Mayor.

Any appeals to the Mayor from rulings of the Commissioner shall be perfected and filed with the Mayor within 20 days exclusive of Sundays and legal holidays from the date such rulings are communicated to the party at interest.

June 19, 1934, 48 Stat. 1142, ch. 672, ch. II, § 33
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(i), 44 DCR 1730
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.
Department of Insurance abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-4301.
1973 Ed., § 35-432.
1981 Ed., § 35-432.
This section is referenced in § 31-1404 and § 31-1506.
Managing general agent license suspension or revocation, appeal from mayor, see § 31-1506.
Examiner orders following mayor’s consideration of findings, appeals, see § 31-1404.